Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 21
CAREY ACT CONSTRUCTION COMPANIES ACTING
AS OPERATING COMPANIES

Sec.

§ 42-2101. Maintenance charges

Statement to be filed with department of water resources. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2102. Publication of statement. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2103. Hearing by department. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2104. Operating regulations subject to review. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 42-2105. Operation matters subject to review. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.